src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection
!! ---------------
!! Livvi quantifiers inflect for case.

LEXICON NUM_
+TYÄ+Num: # ;

LEXICON NUM-STEMS
#yksi:#y NUM_YKSI ;
#kaksi:#ka NUM_KAKSI ;
#kolme:#kolm NUM_KOLME ;
#nelli:#nell NUM_NELLI ;
#viizi:#viid NUM_VIIZI ;
#kuuzi:#kuud NUM_KUUZI ;
#seiččie:#seičče NUM_SEIČČIE ;
#kaheksa:#kaheksa NUM_KAHEKSA ;
#yheksä:#yheksä NUM_YHEKSÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_OZA
+Num+Card: NMN_OZA ;
: ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_MUARJU  !!= __@CODE@__ muarju:muarja
+Num+Card: NMN_MUARJU ;
: ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_SÄYNÄ
+Num+Card: NMN_SÄYNÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_SADA
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%^WGStem00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^WGStem00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_YKSI  !!= @CODE@ yksi:y
+Num+Card: NMN_YKSI ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI  !!= @CODE@ kaksi:ka
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:ksi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:h00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:hte@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:hte@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:htet@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ksi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl0:ksii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ksi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ksi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ksi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:hte%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ; !!= * @CODE@ This cannot be final
 
LEXICON NUM_SEIČČIE  !!= @CODE@ seiččie:seičče
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%^WGStemn0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:me0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:me0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:met@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:mi0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:mii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:mi0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:mi0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:mi0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:mä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_NELLI !!= @CODE@ nelli:nell
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>%{ui%}0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_ä ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>%{aäPar%}0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>%{aäPar%}0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>%{aäPar%}t@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ii0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:ä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKSA !!= @CODE@ kaheksa:kaheksa
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_a ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>ii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
: ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_YHEKSÄ !!= @CODE@ yheksä:yheksä
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_ä ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>ii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%>i0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
: ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT !!= @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ndet@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:nde ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ 
+Qnt+Num: NMN_KARJALAINE ;
